Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,143
Commercial driver's license; CLP-commercial learner's permit; issuance; restriction; surrender of other licenses.

(1) No commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit shall, under any circumstances, be issued to any person who has not attained the age of eighteen years.

(2) A commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit shall not be issued to any person:

(a) During the period the person is subject to a disqualification in this or any other state;

(b) While the person's operator's license is suspended, revoked, or canceled in this or any other state;

(c) When the Commercial Driver License Information System indicates "not-certified"; or

(d) When a federal Drug and Alcohol Clearinghouse query indicates "prohibited".

(3) The department shall not issue any commercial driver's license to any person unless the person applying for a commercial driver's license first surrenders to the department all operators' licenses issued to such person by this or any other state. Any operator's license issued by another state which is surrendered to the department shall be destroyed, and the director shall send notice to the other state that the operator's license has been surrendered.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 93;

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 11;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 11;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 28;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 37.